Utah statutes.
31A-29-120.   Enterprise fund.
(1)  There is created an enterprise fund known as the Comprehensive Health
Insurance Pool Enterprise Fund.
(2)  The following funds shall be credited to the pool fund:
(a) appropriations from the General Fund;
(b)  pool policy premium payments; and
(c)  all interest and dividends earned on the pool fund's assets.
(3)  All money received by the pool fund shall be deposited in compliance with
Section 51-4-1 and shall be held by the state treasurer and invested in
accordance with Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.
(4)  The pool fund shall comply with the accounting policies, procedures, and
reporting requirements established by the Division of Finance.
(5)  The pool fund shall comply with Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services
Code.
